Oklahoma, session 2025, SB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 151.4 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act, “mass casualty event” means an incident
that:
1. Results in no less than three (3) injured individuals;
2. Requires more emergency response resources than are
typically available in the jurisdiction in which the incident
occurs; and
3. Results in a sudden and timely surge of injured individuals
in need of emergency services.
B. After the occurrence of a mass casualty event caused by a
violent crime, as defined in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation may respond to

the incident without a request from a law enforcement agency and
coordinate with local law enforcement agencies that are responding
to the event.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 151.5 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation to be designated the
“Mass Casualty Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
from legislative appropriations, federal grants, or funds from any
other source provided for the purpose of investigating mass casualty
events. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation for the purpose provided for in this act.
Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the
State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 37 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 37 Page 3